test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3nensg-ade_gt-norm.yaml
    pohjastianen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjastiasella
    pohjoinen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjoisella
    pohjonen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjosella
    poikanen+N+Sg+Ade: poikasella
    poskihuokunen+N+Sg+Ade: poskihuokusella
    potukkuoriminen+N+Sg+Ade: potukkuorimisella
    puiminen+N+Sg+Ade: puimisella
    pukanen+N+Sg+Ade: pukasella
    punakeltanen+N+Sg+Ade: punakeltasella
    punanen+N+Sg+Ade: punasella
    punaverinen+N+Sg+Ade: punaverisella
    puoliaikhainen+N+Sg+Ade: puoliaikhaisella
    puolipitoinen+N+Sg+Ade: puolipitoisella
    puolipäivänen+N+Sg+Ade: puolipäiväsellä
    puolivillanen+N+Sg+Ade: puolivillasella
    puppunen+N+Sg+Ade: puppusella
    pussonen+N+Sg+Ade: pussosella
    vetonen+N+Sg+Ade: vetosella
    korkeamaitonen+N+Sg+Ade: korkeamaitosella
    koppaviitonen+N+Sg+Ade: koppaviitosella
    jäykkäluontonen+N+Sg+Ade: jäykkäluontosella
    liettonen+N+Sg+Ade: liettosella
    kolttonen+N+Sg+Ade: kolttosella
    väävinkutonen+N+Sg+Ade: väävinkutosella
    kuutonen+N+Sg+Ade: kuutosella
    hevonen+N+Sg+Ade: hevosella
    hevonen+N+Sg+Ade: hevosella
    tammahevonen+N+Sg+Ade: tammahevosella
    tasanen+N+Sg+Ade: tasasella
    tautihevonen+N+Sg+Ade: tautihevosella
    tervapääskynen+N+Sg+Ade: tervapääskysellä
    tianen+N+Sg+Ade: tiasella
    tiitiainen+N+Sg+Ade: tiitiaisella
    tiitinen+N+Sg+Ade: tiitisellä
    timanttipalanen+N+Sg+Ade: timanttipalasella
    tippanen+N+Sg+Ade: tippasella
    tiukheinen+N+Sg+Ade: tiukheisella
    tiukutianen+N+Sg+Ade: tiukutiasella
    toiskielinen+N+Sg+Ade: toiskielisella
    tokkanen+N+Sg+Ade: tokkasella
    totinen+N+Sg+Ade: totisella
    toukomettinen+N+Sg+Ade: toukomettisella
    trykinen+N+Sg+Ade: trykisellä
    tuhanen+N+Sg+Ade: tuhasella
    tulipakkanen+N+Sg+Ade: tulipakkasella
    tulivihanen+N+Sg+Ade: tulivihasella
    tunen+N+Sg+Ade: tusella
    tuominen+N+Sg+Ade: tuomisella
    tyärihminen+N+Sg+Ade: tyärihmisellä
    työhevonen+N+Sg+Ade: työhevosella
    täkinpäälinen+N+Sg+Ade: täkinpäälisellä
    täyshermonen+N+Sg+Ade: täyshermosella
    täysikanen+N+Sg+Ade: täysikasella
    törmäpääskynen+N+Sg+Ade: törmäpääskysellä
    töylynen+N+Sg+Ade: töylysellä
    ukkonen+N+Sg+Ade: ukkosella
    ukkopahanen+N+Sg+Ade: ukkopahasella
    umpinen+N+Sg+Ade: umpisella
    urpanen+N+Sg+Ade: urpasella
    uuhinen+N+Sg+Ade: uuhisella
    uutinen+N+Sg+Ade: uutisella
    uutunen+N+Sg+Ade: uutusella
    vaaronen+N+Sg+Ade: vaarosella
    vaatheinen+N+Sg+Ade: vaatheisella
    vaimoihminen+N+Sg+Ade: vaimoihmisella
    vaivanen+N+Sg+Ade: vaivasella
    vanhikänen+N+Sg+Ade: vanhikäsellä
    varashevonen+N+Sg+Ade: varashevosella
    varaspoikanen+N+Sg+Ade: varaspoikasella
    varhainen+N+Sg+Ade: varhaisella
    varpunen+N+Sg+Ade: varpusella
    vasta-alkunen+N+Sg+Ade: vasta-alkusella
    vastahakanen+N+Sg+Ade: vastahakasella
    vastanen+N+Sg+Ade: vastasella
    veikkonen+N+Sg+Ade: veikkosella
    velinen+N+Sg+Ade: velisellä
    vellinen+N+Sg+Ade: vellisellä
    verinen+N+Sg+Ade: verisellä
    vesihevonen+N+Sg+Ade: vesihevosella
    vesipääskynen+N+Sg+Ade: vesipääskysellä
    vesipörhöinen+N+Sg+Ade: vesipörhöisellä
    vetinen+N+Sg+Ade: vetisellä
    vetohevonen+N+Sg+Ade: vetohevosella
    vetonen+N+Sg+Ade: vetosella
    vierasvaranen+N+Sg+Ade: vierasvarasella
    vieroihminen+N+Sg+Ade: vieroihmisella
    vihneperänen+N+Sg+Ade: vihneperäsellä
    viisloppinen+N+Sg+Ade: viisloppisella
    viisseinäinen+N+Sg+Ade: viisseinäisellä
    viisäyrinen+N+Sg+Ade: viisäyrisellä
    viljaperhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: viljaperhäisellä
    villi-ihminen+N+Sg+Ade: villi-ihmisellä
    voikärpänen+N+Sg+Ade: voikärpäsellä
    voilautanen+N+Sg+Ade: voilautasella
    voimurunen+N+Sg+Ade: voimurusella
    vuoohinen+N+Sg+Ade: vuoohisella
    vuorolankanen+N+Sg+Ade: vuorolankasella
    vuosikymmenen+N+Sg+Ade: vuosikymmesellä
    vyötianen+N+Sg+Ade: vyötiasella
    vähäväkinen+N+Sg+Ade: vähäväkisellä
    väkinen+N+Sg+Ade: väkisellä
    väkiriipiminen+N+Sg+Ade: väkiriipimisellä
    väliaikanen+N+Sg+Ade: väliaikasella
    väliperhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: väliperhäisellä
    välipuolipäivänen+N+Sg+Ade: välipuolipäiväsellä
    pörhönen+N+Sg+Ade: pörhösellä
    pörhönen+N+Sg+Ade: pörhösellä
    koipörhönen+N+Sg+Ade: koipörhösellä
    mökkönen+N+Sg+Ade: mökkösellä
    onnennäkönen+N+Sg+Ade: onnennäkösellä
    ryyppönen+N+Sg+Ade: ryyppösellä
    paskaryyppönen+N+Sg+Ade: paskaryyppösellä
    paskaryyppönen+N+Sg+Ade: paskaryyppösellä
    kläppönen+N+Sg+Ade: kläppösellä
    yksönen+N+Sg+Ade: yksösellä
    ylihuominen+N+Sg+Ade: ylihuomisella
    yliikänen+N+Sg+Ade: yliikäsellä
    ylinen+N+Sg+Ade: ylisellä
    ympäristöihminen+N+Sg+Ade: ympäristöihmisellä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ade: äärheisellä
    öljysininen+N+Sg+Ade: öljysinisellä
